Hawaii statutes.
[§150A-7.6] Processing fees for
importation and possession requests. (a) There is imposed a fee
for the processing of requests for the importation or possession of plants,
animals, or soil that require a permit, or for the importation or possession of
microorganisms that require a permit, letter of authorization, or registration
under this chapter. The fee shall be paid in full at the time the request is
submitted.

(b) The fees collected under this section
shall be deposited into the pest inspection, quarantine, and eradication fund
established under section 150A-4.5.

(c) The fees to process requests for
importation and possession shall be as follows:

(1) $20 for a permit for a single shipment of
restricted plants;

(2) $100 for a permit for unlimited number of
shipments of restricted plants, as provided by permit, occurring within one
year of the date of issuance;

(3) $20 for a permit for a single shipment of
conditionally approved animals;

(4) $100 for a permit for up to an unlimited number
of shipments of conditionally approved animals, as provided by permit,
occurring within one year of the date of issuance;

(5) $50 for a permit for a single shipment of
restricted animals that require permits for both importation and possession;

(6) $200 for a permit for up to an unlimited number
of shipments of restricted animals that require permits for importation and
possession, as provided by permit, occurring within one year of the date of
issuance;

(7) $100 for a special permit for an unlisted animal
in an emergency or disaster situation or for conducting medical or scientific
research;

(8) $500 for a short-term special permit for an
unlisted animal for a film production, performance, or exhibition;

(9) $2500 for a permit for plants, animals, or microorganisms
that require a rule amendment to change a listing maintained by the board
pursuant to section 150A-6.1, 150A-6.2, or 150A-6.3, to allow importation or
possession of the organism or to otherwise accommodate the request for import
or possession;

(10) $150 for a permit for a single shipment of listed
or unlisted microorganisms that require permits for importation and possession;

(11) $500 for a permit for up to an unlimited number
of shipments of listed or unlisted microorganisms that require a permit for
importation or possession, as provided by permit, occurring within one year of
the date of issuance or within a specified calendar year;

(12) $50 for a letter of authorization for import of
unlisted microorganisms;

(13) $100 for an emergency permit of an unlisted
microorganism or a microorganism on the list of restricted microorganisms in an
emergency or disaster situation;

(14) $150 for registration to import a microbial
product; and

(15) $150 for registration of a laboratory described
in section 150A-6.3(f)(2).

(d) In addition to any fee under subsection
(c), a fee of $250 shall be charged for the expedited processing of a permit,
letter of authorization, or registration application. Expedited processing
shall take no more than thirty days and shall not be available for a permit for
importation or possession of plants, animals, or microorganisms that require:

(1) An amendment to rules to change the listing of
the organism;

(2) Board approval; or

(3) Review as to the requirements of chapter 343. [L
2010, c 172, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next